Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.92.900

Short title.

This chapter may be known and cited as the Washington voting rights act of 2018.

[ 2019 c 64 s 16; 2018 c 113 s 101.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2019 c 64: See note following RCW 1.20.110.